North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 13. Nutrition.

§ 130A-361.
Department to establish nutrition program.

The Department shall establish and administer a nutrition program to promote the public health by achieving and maintaining optimal nutritional status in the population through activities such as nutrition screening and assessment; dietary counseling
and treatment; nutrition education; follow-up; referral; and the direct provision of food. The program may also include, but shall not be limited to, establishing policies and standards for nutritional practices; monitoring and
surveillance of nutritional status; promoting interagency cooperation, professional education and consultation; providing technical assistance; conducting and supporting field research; providing direct care; and advising State
and private institutions and other State and local agencies and departments in the establishment of food, nutrition and food service management standards.

The Commission for Public Health shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program.

History.
Resolution 112, 1973, p. 1413; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1989, c. 204; 1991, c. 188, s. 1; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services” in subsection (b).

§§ 130A-362 through 130A-365.

Reserved for future codification purposes.